Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6200.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 14h. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 445 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 445.33(2)(b) Pub ord E Mail theft â second or subsequent offense 5 445.65 Pub ord E Identity theft 5 Pub ord D Identity theft â second offense 10 Pub ord C Identify theft â third or subsequent offense 15 445.67 Pub ord E Solicit, obtain, possess, sell, or transfer personal identifying information of another or falsify a police report with intent to commit identity theft 5 Pub ord D Obtain, possess, sell, or transfer personal identifying information of another or falsify a police report with intent to commit identity theft â second offense 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 Pub ord C Obtain, possess, sell, or transfer personal identifying information of another or falsify a police report with intent to commit identity theft â third or subsequent offense 15 445.408(2) Pub ord E Buying or selling stolen scrap metal 5 445.408(3) Pub ord E Buying or selling stolen scrap metal â subsequent offense 5 445.433(2) Pub ord E Knowingly buying or selling stolen scrap metal or other specific items 5 445.487(2) Pub ord H Precious metal and gem dealer failure to record material matter â subsequent offense 2 445.488(2) Pub ord H Precious metal and gem dealer violations â subsequent offense 2 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 445.489 Pub ord H Precious metal and gem dealer failing to record transaction or falsifying transaction record, or making improper purchase 2 445.490 Pub ord H Precious metal and gem dealer failure to obtain a certificate of registration or retain precious item for required period 2 445.574(2)(c) Pub ord E Failure to originate and maintain record of deposits on certain containers valued at $10,000.00 or more but less than $20,000.00 with intent to defraud or cheat, or repeat offense 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 445.574(2)(d) Pub ord C Failure to originate and maintain record of deposits on certain containers valued at $20,000.00 or more but less than $50,000.00 with intent to defraud or cheat, or repeat offense 15 445.574(2)(e) Pub ord C Failure to originate and maintain record of deposits on certain containers valued at $50,000.00 or more but less than $100,000.00 with intent to defraud or cheat, or repeat offense 15 445.574(2)(f) Pub ord B Failure to originate and maintain record of deposits on certain containers valued at $100,000.00 or more with intent to defraud or cheat, or repeat offense 20 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 445.574a(2)(d) Pub ord H Improper return of 10,000 or more nonrefundable containers 5 445.574a(3)(d) Pub ord H Improper acceptance or delivery of 10,000 or more nonrefundable containers by dealer 5 445.574a(4)(d) Pub ord H Improper acceptance or delivery of 10,000 or more nonrefundable containers by distributor 5 445.667 Pub ord G Changing, altering, or modifying reverse vending machine or data for reverse vending machine 2 445.779 Pub ord H Antitrust violation 2 445.1505 Pub trst G Fraudulent filing, offer, or sale of franchise 7 445.1508 Pub trst G Sale of franchise without proper disclosure 7 445.1513 Pub trst G Illegal offer or sale of franchise 7 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 445.1520 Pub trst G Failure to keep or maintain record of sale of franchise 7 445.1521 Pub trst G False representation of departmental finding, recommendation, or approval of franchise document 7 445.1523 Pub trst G False statement of material fact to department of attorney general regarding franchise 7 445.1525 Pub trst G False advertising of franchise 7 445.1671 Pub trst E False statement in report required by mortgage broker or lender 15 445.2081 Pub ord E Purchasing or selling stolen plastic bulk merchandise containers 5 445.2507(2) Pub ord F Violation of unsolicited commercial e-mail protection act in furtherance of crime 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 445.2583 Pub trst F Establish, promote, or operate a pyramid promotional scheme 7 445.2661 Pub trst C False statement in report required by mortgage broker, lender, or servicer 15 Sec. 14p. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapters 482 to 499 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 482.44 Property H Bills of lading â issuance for goods not received 5 482.46 Property H Bills of lading â issuance of duplicate negotiable bill with intent to defraud 5 482.48 Property H Bills of lading â negotiation when goods not in carriers' possession 5 482.49 Property H Bills of lading â inducing carrier to issue when goods have not been received 5 482.50 Property H Bills of lading â issuance of non-negotiable bill not so marked 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 487.1042(1) Pub trst E Money transmission services act â intentionally making a false statement, misrepresentation, or certification in a record or document 5 487.1042(2) Pub trst E Criminal fraud in the conduct of money transmission services business 5 487.1042(3) Pub trst E Money transmission services act license violation 5 487.1505(6) Pub trst E BIDCO act â knowingly receiving money or property at an interest rate exceeding 25% 5 492.137(a) Pub trst H Installment sales of motor vehicles 3 493.56a(13) Pub trst C False statement in reports â secondary mortgage 15 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6177 (request no. H05171'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.